Washington statutes.
RCW 5.44.090

Copy of instrument restoring civil rights as evidence.

The secretary of state and the clerk of the superior court, shall, upon demand and the payment of the fee required by law, issue a certified copy of any such instrument restoring civil rights filed in their respective offices, and every such certified copy shall be received in evidence as proof of the fact therein stated, in any court and by all election officers.

[ 1931 c 19 s 4; 1929 c 26 s 5; RRS s 10253.]

NOTES:

Restoration of civil rights: Chapter 9.96 RCW.